apertium-yrl.yrl.twol
Alphabet
 A B C Ç D E É Á Ã F G H I Ĩ Í J K L M N O Ó Õ P R S T U Ũ W Y Z
 a b c ç d e é á ã f g h i ĩ í j k l m n o ó õ p r s t u ũ w y z
 %{A%}:a %>:0
 %{I%}:i %{I%}:ĩ
 %{U%}:u %{U%}:0
 %{A%}:a %{A%}:0
 %{AUG%}:0
 %{DER%}:0
   
;

Sets

AccentedVowel = Á Ã É Ẽ Í Ĩ Ũ Ó Õ
                á ã é ẽ í ĩ ũ ó õ ;

UnaccentedVowel = %{A%} A E I U O
                        a e i u o ;

Rules

"Add diacritic to diminutive inflection when unstressed 'a' is at coda position"
%{I%}:ĩ <=> a: %>: _ ;

"Remove 'a' when there is a cluster of the type 'aĩ'"
a:0 <=> _ %>: %{I%}: ;

"Unaccented vowel  as 0 before augmentative inflection"
UnaccentedVowel:0 <=> _ %>: %{AUG%}: ;

"'u' as 0 in a cluster of the type 'uu'"
%{U%}:0 <=> u: UnaccentedVowel: %>: %{AUG%}: _ ;

"'é' as 'e' before derivation inflection"
é:e <=> _ %>: %{DER%}: ;

! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
